src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB_SYÖDÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 64 yö
!!€  syödä: syödä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # eat
0:yöd  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:yöd  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:yö  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:yö  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ö  ;
0:ö  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ö  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ö  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:yö  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:yö  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:yö  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_D  ;
0:yö  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yö  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;
0:yö  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
!0:yö  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_NTI  ;

!!  In past and conditional forms of käydä, the glide before suffix is marked
!!  even in normative orthography.

LEXICON VERB_KÄYDÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 65
!!€  käydä: käydä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # visit, go for
0:yd  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:yd  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:v  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:v  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:v  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_D  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
!0:y  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_NTI  ;

!! ### Verbs with consonant stems

!!  Verbs with momentane derivation are common consonant stems.

LEXICON VERB_MARISTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 66 back
!!€  marista: marista+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # whine
0:t  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_STRONG  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_ÄRISTÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 66 front
!!€  äristä: äristä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # arr
0:t  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_STRONG  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;


LEXICON VERB_HÄVÄISTÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 66 front v p
!!€  häväistä: häväistä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # sacrilege
0:väist  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:väist  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:päise  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:päise  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:päise  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:päis  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:päis  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:päis  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:väis  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:väis  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0:väis  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:väis  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:väis  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_STRONG  ;
0:päise  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_VAVISTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 66 back v~p
!!€  vavista: vavista+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # shake
0:vist  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:vist  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pise  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pise  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pise  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:pis  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:pis  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pis  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:vis  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:vis  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0:vis  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:vis  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:vis  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_STRONG  ;
0:pis  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;
:vis  VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_S_ARCHAIC  ;


LEXICON VERB_RANGAISTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 66 back k~g
!!€  rangaista: rangaista+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # punish
0:gaist  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:gaist  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kaise  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kaise  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kaise  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:kais  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:kais  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kais  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:gais  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:gais  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0:gais  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:gais  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:gais  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_STRONG  ;
0:kaise  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!! ### Verbs with n, r, l, s stems
!!  Notably, the a infinitive forms d assimilates to preceding consonant.

LEXICON VERB_SURRA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 67 back r
!!€  surra: surra+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # meh
0:r  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:r  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_R  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_R  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_R  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:r  VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_R_ARCHAIC  ;


LEXICON VERB_PIERRÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 67 front r
!!€  pierrä: pierrä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # fart
0:r  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:r  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_R  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_R  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_R  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
:r  VERB_FRONT_OPTATIVE_R_ARCHAIC  ;

LEXICON VERB_PANNA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 67 back n
!!€  panna: panna+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # put
0:n  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:n  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_N  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_N  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_MENNÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 67 front n
!!€  mennä: mennä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # go
0:n  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:n  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_N  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_N  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!!  Frequentative derivations are most common source of l stemmed verbs.

LEXICON VERB_VASTAILLA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 67 back l
!!€  vastailla: vastailla+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # answer
0:l  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:l  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_L  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_L  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_L  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 67 frot l
!!€  äksyillä: äksyillä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:l  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:l  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_L  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_L  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_LEIKELLÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 67 front l 0k
!!€  leikellä: leikellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # cut
0:ell  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:ell  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:kele  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kele  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kele  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:kel  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kel  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:kel  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:el  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:el  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L  ;
0:el  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_L  ;
0:el  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:el  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_L  ;
0:kele  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
