src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB
arvella+V:arvel  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
edeskäydä+V:edeskä  VERB_KÄYDÄ  ;
edesmennä+V:edesme  VERB_MENNÄ  ;
esillepanna+V:esillepan  VERB_PANNA  ;
esillepanna+V:esillepa  VERB_PANNA  ;
haeskella+V:haeskel  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
happopestä+V:happopes  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
helmeillä+V:helmeil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
hemaista+V:hemais  VERB_MARISTA  ;
hentoilla+V:hentoil  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
hivellä+V:hivel  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
hortoilla+V:hortoil  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
hotaista+V:hotais  VERB_MARISTA  ;
hurista+V:huris  VERB_MARISTA  ;
hymistä+V:hymis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
häikäillä+V:häikäil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
häippäistä+V:häippäis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
häväistä+V:hä  VERB_HÄVÄISTÄ  ;
hökäistä+V:hökäis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
hölmistellä+V:hölmistel  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
höristä+V:höris  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
intoilla+V:intoil  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
irvistellä+V:irvistel  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
julkipanna+V:julkipan  VERB_PANNA  ;
julkipanna+V:julkipa  VERB_PANNA  ;
juoruilla+V:juoruil  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
jupista+V:jupis  VERB_MARISTA  ;
jymistä+V:jymis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
karista+V:karis  VERB_MARISTA  ;
keilailla+V:keilail  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
keksaista+V:keksais  VERB_MARISTA  ;
keskenmennä+V:keskenmen  VERB_MENNÄ  ;
keskenmennä+V:keskenme  VERB_MENNÄ  ;
kieriskellä+V:kieriskel  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
kihistä+V:kihis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
kiskaista+V:kiskais  VERB_MARISTA  ;
kivipestä+V:kivipes  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
kokoonpanna+V:kokoonpan  VERB_PANNA  ;
kokoonpanna+V:kokoonpa  VERB_PANNA  ;
komeilla+V:komeil  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
kumista+V:kumis  VERB_MARISTA  ;
kuntoonpanna+V:kuntoonpan  VERB_PANNA  ;
kuntoonpanna+V:kuntoonpa  VERB_PANNA  ;
kurvailla+V:kurvail  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
kyhäillä+V:kyhäil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
kähistä+V:kähis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
käppäillä+V:käppäil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
käydä+V:kä  VERB_KÄYDÄ  ;
kääräistä+V:kääräis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
köyhäillä+V:köyhäil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
laiminlyödä+V:laimin#l  VERB_SYÖDÄ  ;
laiminlyödä+V:laiminl  VERB_SYÖDÄ  ;
laukaista+V:laukais  VERB_MARISTA  ;
leikellä+V:leik  VERB_LEIKELLÄ  ;
leveillä+V:leveil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
liikkeellepanna+V:liikkeellepan  VERB_PANNA  ;
liikkeellepanna+V:liikkeellepa  VERB_PANNA  ;
luistella+V:luistel  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
lyödä+V:l  VERB_SYÖDÄ  ;
läpikäydä+V:läpikä  VERB_KÄYDÄ  ;
läpivalaista+V:läpivalais  VERB_MARISTA  ;
lätistä+V:lätis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
maksuunpanna+V:maksuunpan  VERB_PANNA  ;
maksuunpanna+V:maksuunpa  VERB_PANNA  ;
mennä+Err/Orth+V:me  VERB_MENNÄ  ;
mennä+V:men  VERB_MENNÄ  ;
metsästellä+V:metsästel  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
muistiinpanna+V:muistiinpan  VERB_PANNA  ;
muistiinpanna+V:muistiinpa  VERB_PANNA  ;
mulkoilla+V:mulkoil  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
mutista+V:mutis  VERB_MARISTA  ;
myödä+V:m  VERB_SYÖDÄ  ;
myötäillä+V:myötäil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
nirhaista+V:nirhais  VERB_MARISTA  ;
nyhjäistä+V:nyhjäis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
ohimennä+V:ohimen  VERB_MENNÄ  ;
ohimennä+V:ohime  VERB_MENNÄ  ;
oikaista+V:oikais  VERB_MARISTA  ;
orjailla+V:orjail  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
panna+V:pan  VERB_PANNA  ;
pelkäillä+V:pelkäil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
pestä+V:pes  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
pierrä+V:pier  VERB_PIERRÄ  ;
poikkaista+V:poikkais  VERB_MARISTA  ;
pokkailla+V:pokkail  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
pulista+V:pulis  VERB_MARISTA  ;
purra+V:pur  VERB_SURRA  ;
pyttyillä+V:pyttyil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
pölistä+V:pölis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
railoilla+V:railoil  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
rangaista+V:ran  VERB_RANGAISTA  ;
ratkaista+V:ratkais  VERB_MARISTA  ;
retkeillä+V:retkeil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
ropista+V:ropis  VERB_MARISTA  ;
ruuvailla+V:ruuvail  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
rymistä+V:rymis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
röhistä+V:röhis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
röyhtäillä+V:röyhtäil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
siristä+V:siris  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
sohaista+V:sohais  VERB_MARISTA  ;
suipistella+V:suipistel  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
surra+V:sur  VERB_SURRA  ;
syödä+V:s  VERB_SYÖDÄ  ;
säästellä+V:säästel  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
tiuskasta+V:tiuskas  VERB_MARISTA  ;
todistella+V:todistel  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
toimeenpanna+V:toimeenpan  VERB_PANNA  ;
toimeenpanna+V:toimeenpa  VERB_PANNA  ;
täristä+V:täris  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
täytäntöönpanna+V:täytäntöönpan  VERB_PANNA  ;
täytäntöönpanna+V:täytäntöönpa  VERB_PANNA  ;
törmäillä+V:törmäil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
ulvoskella+V:ulvoskel  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
vavista+V:va  VERB_VAVISTA  ;
viipyillä+V:viipyil  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
vikistä+V:vikis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
vilkaista+V:vilkais  VERB_MARISTA  ;
vireillepanna+V:vireillepan  VERB_PANNA  ;
virnuilla+V:virnuil  VERB_VASTAILLA  ;
ylensyödä+V:ylens  VERB_SYÖDÄ  ;
ylpistellä+V:ylpistel  VERB_ÄKSYILLÄ  ;
ähkäistä+V:ähkäis  VERB_ÄRISTÄ  ;
